Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8806
Limitation on use of facilities and funds.

No state facilities, no state funds, fees, or charges, and no investment income on state funds shall be used to destroy human embryos for the purpose of research. In no case shall state facilities, state funds, fees, or charges, or investment income on state funds be used to create a human embryo by somatic cell nuclear transfer for any purpose.

Laws 2008, LB606, § 6.
March 26, 2008